Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.120

Farm labor contractor—Prohibited acts.

No person acting as a farm labor contractor shall:

(1) Make any misrepresentation or false statement in an application for a license.

(2) Make or cause to be made, to any person, any false, fraudulent, or misleading representation, or publish or circulate or cause to be published or circulated any false, fraudulent, or misleading information concerning the terms or conditions or existence of employment at any place or places, or by any person or persons, or of any individual or individuals.

(3) Send or transport any worker to any place where the farm labor contractor knows a strike or lockout exists.

(4) Do any act in the capacity of a farm labor contractor, or cause any act to be done, which constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude under any law of the state of Washington.

[ 1985 c 280 s 10; 1955 c 392 s 12.]